California, session 20252026, AB443.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25302.2 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25302.2. (a) As part of the 2027 edition of the integrated energy policy report, the commission shall include an assessment of the potential for using curtailed solar and wind generation to produce hydrogen.(b) The assessment shall do all of the following:(1) Provide an estimate of how much solar and wind generation is curtailed monthly and annually.(2) Provide an estimate of how much solar and wind generation that is curtailed monthly and annually is due to an excess of solar and wind generation relative to system demand.(3) Provide an estimate of how much solar and wind generation that is curtailed monthly and annually is due to a lack of capacity from transmission facilities.(4) Identify the regions of the state where solar and wind energy is being curtailed and determine for each identified region whether the curtailment is due to excess solar and wind generation relative to system demand or due to a lack of capacity from transmission facilities.(5) Provide an estimate of how much hydrogen could feasibly and reliably be produced using energy from curtailed solar and wind generation.(6) Identify the necessary regulatory and policy actions to optimize the use of energy from curtailed solar and wind generation for hydrogen production.(c) For purposes of this section, “curtailed solar and wind generation” means the difference between the reduced solar and wind generation output and the amount of solar and wind energy that could be produced without demand or transmission constraints.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.